District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.04

Voting on amendments by voting groups.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, if a nonprofit corporation has more than one class of members, the members of each class shall be entitled to vote as a separate voting group, if member voting is otherwise required by this chapter, on a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation if the amendment would:

(1)

Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the memberships of the class into memberships of another class;

(2)

Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right of exchange, of all or part of the memberships of another class into memberships of the class;

(3)

Change the rights, preferences, or limitations of all or part of the memberships of the class in a manner different than the amendment would affect another class;

(4)

Change the rights, preferences, or limitations of all or part of the memberships of the class by changing the rights, preferences, or limitations of another class;

(5)

Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for that class;

(6)

Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class; or

(7)

Authorize a new class of memberships.

(b)

If a class of members will be divided into 2 or more classes by an amendment to the articles of incorporation, the amendment shall be approved by a majority of the members of each class that will be created.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-407.03, § 29-408.07, § 29-408.22, and § 29-409.04.